exercise1/en_ia_morphology.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
	+N	! Noun tag
        +Sg	! Singular
        +Pl	! Plural
 	+Poss	! Possessive form
        +V      ! Verb tag
        +Inf    ! Infinitive or present tense
        +Pres3Sg ! 3rd person singular, present tense
        +Past   ! Past tense
        +Prog   ! Progressive


LEXICON Root
	Nouns ; ! No input, no output
        Verbs ;     
!
! NOUNS start here
!

LEXICON Nouns

cat	N ;
dog	N ;
book    N ;
fan     N ;
hill    N ;
pet     N ;
lexicon N ;

church	  N_s ;
kiss	  N_s ;
mess      N_s ;
search    N_s ;
waitress  N_s ;
wish      N_s ;

beauty:beaut	N_y ;
sky:sk		N_y ;
doggy:dogg      N_y ;

criterion:criteri   N_on ;
lexicon:lexic       N_on ;
phenomenon:phenomen N_on ;


! The noun lexica N and Num are used for stems without any alternation

LEXICON N
+N:0	Num ;

LEXICON Num
+Sg:0	PossWithS ;
+Pl:s	PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_s and Num_s are used for stems that end in a sibilant
! and need an extra inserted "e"

LEXICON N_s
+N:0	Num_s ;

LEXICON Num_s
+Sg:0	PossWithS ;
+Pl:es	PossWithoutS ;

! The noun lexica N_y and Num_y are used for stems with "y" -> "ie" alternation

LEXICON N_y
+N:0	Num_y ;

LEXICON Num_y
+Sg:y	PossWithS ;
+Pl:ies	PossWithoutS ;

LEXICON N_on
+N:0    Num_on ;

LEXICON Num_on 
+Sg:on   PossWithS ;
+Pl:a    PossWithS ;

! Possessive endings: usually the singular is 's and the plural is '

LEXICON PossWithS
+Poss:'s     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

LEXICON PossWithoutS
+Poss:'	     # ;
	     # ; ! No ending: no input, no output

!
! VERBS start here
!

LEXICON Verbs

jump        V ;
look        V ;
talk        V ;
walk        V ;

bake:bak    V_e ;
fake:fak    V_e ;
like:lik    V_e ;
pile:pil    V_e ;
smile:smil  V_e ;

crash       V_s ;
hiss        V_s ;
kiss        V_s ;
miss        V_s ;
search      V_s ;

LEXICON V
+V:0    Tense ;

LEXICON Tense
+Inf:0     # ;
+Pres3Sg:s # ;
+Past:ed   # ;
+Prog:ing  # ;

! Verbs ending in e

LEXICON V_e
+V:0    Tense_e ;

LEXICON Tense_e
+Inf:e     # ;
+Pres3Sg:es # ;
+Past:ed    # ;
+Prog:ing  # ;

! Verbs ending in s, sh, ch, x

LEXICON V_s
+V:0    Tense_s ;

LEXICON Tense_s
+Inf:0     # ;
+Pres3Sg:es # ;
+Past:ed   # ;
+Prog:ing  # ;

END
